Utah statutes.
34-28-2.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)  "Commission" means the Labor Commission.
(2)  "Division" means the Division of Antidiscrimination and Labor.
(3)  "Employer" includes every person, firm, partnership, association,
corporation, receiver or other officer of a court of this state, and any agent
or officer of any of the above-mentioned classes, employing any person in this
state.
(4)  "Wages" means all amounts due the employee for labor or services, whether
the amount is fixed or ascertained on a time, task, piece, commission basis or
other method of calculating such amount.
